Maryland, session 2025, HB0870.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0870*

HOUSE BILL 870
Article – Business Regulation
Subtitle 4. Tobacco Product Manufacturers [Escrow] EQUITY Act.
16–401.
(a) Cigarette smoking presents serious public health concerns to the State and to
the citizens of the State. The United States Surgeon General has determined that smoking
causes lung cancer, heart disease, and other serious diseases, and that there are hundreds
of thousands of tobacco–related deaths in the United States each year. These diseases most
often do not appear until many years after the person in question begins smoking.
(b) Cigarette smoking also presents serious financial concerns for the State.
Under certain health care programs, the State may have a legal obligation to provide
medical assistance to eligible persons for health conditions associated with cigarette
smoking, and those persons may have a legal entitlement to receive the medical assistance.
(c) Under these programs, the State pays millions of dollars each year to provide
medical assistance for these persons for health conditions associated with cigarette
smoking.
(d) It is the policy of the State that financial burdens imposed on the State by
cigarette smoking be borne by tobacco product manufacturers rather than by the State [to
the extent that such manufacturers either determine to enter into a settlement with the
State or are found culpable by the courts] AND, FOR THAT PURPOSE, TOBACCO
PRODUCT MANUFACTURERS THAT HAVE SETTLED WITH THE STATE PAY THE STATE
MILLIONS OF DOLLARS EACH YEAR, UNLIKE OTHER TOBACCO PRODUCT
MANUFACTURERS THAT DO NOT MAKE DIRECT PAYMENTS.
(e) On November 23, 1998, leading United States tobacco product manufacturers
entered into a settlement agreement, entitled the “Master Settlement Agreement”, with
the State. The Master Settlement Agreement obligates these manufacturers, in return for
a release of past, present, and certain future claims against them as described in the
Agreement, to pay substantial sums to the State (tied in part to their volume of sales); to
fund a national foundation devoted to the interests of public health; and to make
substantial changes in their advertising and marketing practices and corporate culture,
with the intention of reducing underage smoking.
(f) [(1) It would be contrary to the policy of the State if tobacco product
manufacturers who determine not to enter into such a settlement could use a resulting cost
advantage to derive large, short–term profits in the years before liability may arise without
ensuring that the State will have an eventual source of recovery from them if they are
proven to have acted culpably.
(2) It is thus in the interest of the State to require such tobacco product
manufacturers to establish a reserve fund to guarantee a source of compensation in order

HOUSE BILL 870 3
to prevent them from deriving large, short–term profits and then becoming judgment–proof
before liability may arise] THE PUBLIC HEALTH OBLIGATIONS OF THE STATE ARE
OWED EQUALLY TO ALL INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE WHO SMOKE, REGARDLESS OF
THE BRAND OF CIGARETTE SMOKED OR THE STATUS OF THE TOBACCO PRODUCT
MANUFACTURER UNDER THE MASTER SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT.
(G) IT IS CONSISTENT WITH THE POLICY OF THE STATE TO REQUIRE
TOBACCO PRODUCT MANUFACTURERS THAT DO NOT MAKE PAYMENTS DIRECTLY TO
THE STATE THROUGH THE MASTER SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT TO PAY AN AMOUNT
THAT IS INTENDED TO:
(1) PREVENT MANUFACTURERS FROM DERIVING LARGE,
SHORT–TERM PROFITS AND THEN BECOMING JUDGMENT–PROOF;
(2) REQUIRE TOBACCO PRODUCT MANUFACTURERS TO INTERNALIZE
THE HEALTH CARE COSTS IMPOSED ON THE STATE BY CIGARETTE SMOKING;
(3) INCREASE THE PRICE OF CIGARETTES TO REDUCE SMOKING
RATES, PARTICULARLY AMONG THE YOUTH OF THE STATE; AND
(4) SERVE AS PARTIAL COMPENSATION FOR THE FINANCIAL
BURDENS IMPOSED ON THE STATE BY CIGARETTE SMOKING.
16–403.
(a) Any tobacco product manufacturer that sells cigarettes to consumers within
the State, whether directly or through a distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary or
intermediaries, after June 1, 1999, shall either:
(1) become a participating manufacturer, as that term is defined in section
II(jj) of the Master Settlement Agreement, and generally perform its financial obligations
under the Master Settlement Agreement; or
(2) (I) [place] HAVE PLACED into a qualified escrow fund by April 15
of the year following the year in question the following amounts, as such amounts are
adjusted for inflation:
[(i)] 1. for 1999, $.0094241 per unit sold after June 1, 1999;
[(ii)] 2. for 2000, $.0104712 per unit sold;
[(iii)] 3. for each of 2001 and 2002, $.0136125 per unit sold;
[(iv)] 4. for each of 2003, 2004, 2005, and 2006, $.0167539 per unit
sold; and

HOUSE BILL 870
[(v)] 5. for 2007 [and each year thereafter] THROUGH 2025,
$.0188482 per unit sold; AND
(II) BEGINNING IN 2026 AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, PAY TO
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AN EQUITY FEE OF $.0188482 PER UNIT SOLD, AS
ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION.
(b) (1) A tobacco product manufacturer that [places] PLACED funds into
escrow in accordance with subsection [(a)(2)] (A)(2)(I) of this section shall receive the
interest or other appreciation on the funds as earned.
(2) The funds themselves shall be released from escrow only under the
following circumstances:
(i) to pay a judgment or settlement on any released claim brought
against such tobacco product manufacturer by the State or any releasing party located or
residing in the State. Funds shall be released from escrow under this subparagraph:
1. in the order in which they were placed into escrow; and
2. only to the extent and at the time necessary to make
payments required under such judgment or settlement;
(ii) to the extent that a tobacco product manufacturer establishes
that the amount it was required to place into escrow on account of units sold in the State
in a particular year was greater than the Master Settlement Agreement payments, as
determined pursuant to section IX(i) of that Agreement, including after final determination
of all adjustments, that such manufacturer would have been required to make on account
of such units sold had it been a participating manufacturer, the excess shall be released
from escrow and revert back to such tobacco manufacturer; or
(iii) to the extent funds are not released from escrow under item (i)
or (ii) of this paragraph, funds shall be released from escrow and revert to such tobacco
product manufacturer 25 years after the date on which they were placed into escrow.
(C) A TOBACCO PRODUCT MANUFACTURER THAT TIMELY PAYS THE EQUITY
FEE UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION MAY CONTEST THE AMOUNT OF
THE EQUITY FEE REQUIRED WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE DATE OF PAYMENT.
(D) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE EQUITY FEES
PAID UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION TO THE CIGARETTE
RESTITUTION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–317 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 870 5
(2) EQUITY FEES DISTRIBUTED TO THE CIGARETTE RESTITUTION
FUND UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE APPROPRIATED FOR
PURPOSES CONSISTENT WITH § 7–317(F)(1)(VI)1 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
[(c)] (E) (1) [Each] ON OR BEFORE APRIL 30 EACH YEAR, EACH tobacco
product manufacturer [that elects to place funds into escrow pursuant to subsection (a)(2)
of this section] shall [annually] certify to the Attorney General that it:
(I) is in compliance with subsections (a)(2) and (b) of this section;
AND
(II) 1. HAS PLACED FUNDS INTO ESCROW UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION; OR
2. HAS PAID THE EQUITY FEE UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) The Attorney General may bring a civil action on behalf of the
State against any tobacco product manufacturer that fails to place into escrow the funds
OR PAY THE EQUITY FEE required under this section.
(II) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS ENTITLED TO RECOVER THE
ATTORNEY’S FEES, COSTS, AND EXPENSES OF THE ACTION FOR THE USE OF THE
STATE.
(III) 1. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DEPOSIT ANY
FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH INTO THE
CIGARETTE RESTITUTION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–317 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
2. EQUITY FEES DISTRIBUTED TO THE CIGARETTE
RESTITUTION FUND UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE
APPROPRIATED FOR PURPOSES CONSISTENT WITH § 7–317(F)(1)(VI)1 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(3) (i) Any tobacco product manufacturer that fails in any year to place
into escrow the funds OR PAY THE EQUITY FEE required under this section shall be
required within 15 days to place such funds into escrow OR PAY THE EQUITY FEE as will
bring the manufacturer into compliance with this section.
(ii) The court, upon a finding of a violation of subsection (a)(2) or (b)
of this section, may impose a civil penalty, to be paid to the General Fund of the State:

HOUSE BILL 870
1. in an amount not to exceed 5 percent of the amount
improperly withheld [from escrow] per day of the violation; and
2. in a total amount not to exceed 100 percent of the original
amount improperly withheld [from escrow].
(4) (i) If a tobacco product manufacturer has knowingly violated
subsection (a)(2) or (b) of this section, the manufacturer shall be required within 15 days to
place such funds into escrow OR PAY THE EQUITY FEE as will bring it into compliance with
this section.
(ii) Upon a finding of a knowing violation of subsection (a)(2) or (b)
of this section, the court may impose a civil penalty, to be paid to the General Fund of the
State:
1. in an amount not to exceed 15 percent of the amount
improperly withheld [from escrow] per day of the violation; and
2. in a total amount not to exceed 300 percent of the original
amount improperly withheld [from escrow].
(5) In the case of a second knowing violation of subsection (a)(2) or (b) of
this section, the tobacco product manufacturer shall be prohibited from selling cigarettes
to consumers within the State, whether directly or through a distributor, retailer, or similar
intermediary or intermediaries, for a period not to exceed 2 years.
(6) Each failure to make the annual deposit OR PAY THE EQUITY FEE
required under this section shall constitute a separate violation.
16–404.
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
Subtitle 5. [Escrow] CERTIFICATION Requirements for [Nonparticipating] Tobacco
Product Manufacturers.
16–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Brand family” means all styles of cigarettes sold under the same
trademark, regardless of whether the cigarettes are differentiated from one another by
means of additional modifiers or descriptors such as “menthol”, “lights”, “kings”, “100s”, or
other differentiation.

HOUSE BILL 870 7
(2) “Brand family” includes any use of a brand name (alone or in
conjunction with any other word) trademark, logo, symbol, motto, selling message,
recognizable pattern of colors, or any other indicia of product identification identical or
similar to, or identifiable with, a previously known brand of cigarettes.
(c) “Cigarette” has the meaning stated in § 16–402(e) of this title (the [Escrow]
EQUITY Act).
(d) “Comptroller” means the Comptroller of the State or any authorized agent of
the Comptroller who is responsible for collection of the excise tax on cigarettes.
(e) [“Escrow] “EQUITY Act” means Subtitle 4 of this title.
(f) “Executive Director” includes an agent or employee of the Alcohol, Tobacco,
and Cannabis Commission responsible for the enforcement of State tobacco laws and
regulations.
(g) “Licensed wholesaler” means a wholesaler who is licensed under Subtitle 2 of
this title to act as a wholesaler and any person who is an authorized agent of the licensed
wholesaler for the stamping and distribution of cigarettes.
(h) “Master Settlement Agreement” has the meaning stated in § 16–402(f) of this
title (the [Escrow] EQUITY Act).
(i) “Nonparticipating manufacturer” means any tobacco product manufacturer
that is not a participating manufacturer.
(j) “Participating manufacturer” has the meaning stated in section II(jj) of the
Master Settlement Agreement and all amendments to the Agreement.
(k) “Qualified escrow fund” has the meaning stated in § 16–402(g) of this title (the
[Escrow] EQUITY Act).
(l) “Tobacco product manufacturer” has the meaning stated in § 16–402(j) of this
title (the [Escrow] EQUITY Act).
(m) “Units sold” has the meaning stated in § 16–402(k) of this title (the [Escrow]
EQUITY Act).
16–503.
(a) A tobacco product manufacturer whose cigarettes are sold in this State,
whether directly or through a distributor, retailer or similar intermediary, shall execute
and deliver, on a form prescribed by the Attorney General, a certification to the Attorney
General no later than the 30th day of April each year, certifying under penalty of perjury
that, as of the date of the certification, the tobacco product manufacturer either:

HOUSE BILL 870
(1) is a participating manufacturer; or
(2) is in full compliance with the [Escrow] EQUITY Act.
(b) (1) A participating manufacturer shall include in its certification a list of
its brand families.
(2) The participating manufacturer shall update the list at least 30
calendar days prior to any addition or modification to its brand families by executing and
delivering a supplemental certification to the Attorney General.
(c) (1) A nonparticipating manufacturer shall include in its certification a
complete list of all of its brand families.
(2) The certification shall:
(i) separately list each brand family of cigarettes and the number of
units sold for each brand family that was sold in the State during the preceding calendar
year;
(ii) list each of its brand families that have been sold in the State at
any time during the current calendar year;
(iii) indicate by an asterisk any brand family sold in the State during
the preceding calendar year that is no longer being sold in the State as of the date of such
certification; and
(iv) identify by name and address any other manufacturer of such
brand families in the preceding or current calendar year.
(3) The nonparticipating manufacturer shall update the list at least 30
calendar days prior to any addition or modification of its brand families by executing and
delivering a supplemental certification to the Attorney General.
(d) (1) In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, the certification shall
further certify that the nonparticipating manufacturer:
(i) is registered to do business in the State or has appointed a
resident agent for service of process and provided notice of the appointment as required by
§ 16–505 of this subtitle;
(ii) 1. REGARDING SALES MADE ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER
31, 2025, has established and continues to maintain a qualified escrow fund, and has
executed a qualified escrow agreement that has been reviewed and approved by the
Attorney General and that governs the qualified escrow fund; [and] OR

HOUSE BILL 870 9
2. HAS PAID THE EQUITY FEE REQUIRED UNDER §
16–403(A)(2)(II) OF THIS TITLE; AND
(iii) is in full compliance with the [Escrow] EQUITY Act and this
subtitle and any regulations adopted in accordance with the [Escrow] EQUITY Act and this
subtitle.
(2) The certification shall include:
(i) FOR NONPARTICIPATING MANUFACTURERS THAT
ESTABLISHED AN ESCROW FUND:
1. the name, address and telephone number of the financial
institution in which the nonparticipating manufacturer has established a qualified escrow
fund required under [§ 16–403(a)(2)] § 16–403(A)(2)(I) of this title (the [Escrow] EQUITY
Act) and all regulations adopted under it;
[(ii)] 2. the account number of the qualified escrow fund and
subaccount number for the State of Maryland;
[(iii)] 3. the amount the nonparticipating manufacturer HAS
placed in the fund for cigarettes sold in the State during the preceding calendar year, the
date and amount of each deposit, and any additional information the Attorney General
considers necessary to confirm the information required by this subparagraph; and
[(iv)] 4. the amount of and date of any withdrawal or transfer of
funds the nonparticipating manufacturer made at any time from the fund or from any other
qualified escrow fund into which the nonparticipating manufacturer made escrow
payments under [§ 16–403(a)(2)] § 16–403(A)(2)(I) of this title (the [Escrow] EQUITY Act)
and all regulations adopted under that section; OR
(II) FOR A NONPARTICIPATING MANUFACTURER THAT PAID THE
EQUITY FEE, THE AMOUNT OF THE PAYMENT THE NONPARTICIPATING
MANUFACTURER HAS PAID FOR CIGARETTES SOLD IN THE STATE DURING THE
PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR, THE DATE AND AMOUNT OF THE PAYMENT, AND ANY
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION THE ATTORNEY GENERAL CONSIDERS NECESSARY TO
CONFIRM THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THIS ITEM.
(e) (1) A tobacco product manufacturer may not include a brand family in its
certification unless:
(i) in the case of a participating manufacturer, the participating
manufacturer affirms that the brand family is deemed to be its cigarettes for purposes of
calculating its payments under the Master Settlement Agreement for the relevant year, in

HOUSE BILL 870
the volume and shares determined in accordance with the Master Settlement Agreement;
and
(ii) in the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, the
nonparticipating manufacturer affirms that the brand family is deemed to be its cigarettes
for purposes of the [Escrow] EQUITY Act.
(2) Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting or otherwise
affecting the State’s right to maintain that a brand family constitutes cigarettes of a
different tobacco product manufacturer for purposes of calculating payments under the
Master Settlement Agreement or for purposes of the [Escrow] EQUITY Act.
(3) The tobacco product manufacturer shall maintain all invoices and
documentation of sales and any other information relied upon for its certification for a
period of 5 years, unless otherwise required by law to maintain them for a greater period
of time.
16–504.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Attorney General shall
develop and make available for public inspection a directory listing all tobacco product
manufacturers that THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES have provided current and
accurate certifications conforming to the requirements of § 16–503 of this subtitle AND
WITH ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL LAWS and all COMPLIANT brand
families that are listed in such certifications.
(b) (1) The Attorney General may not include or retain in the directory the
name or brand families of any nonparticipating manufacturer that fails to provide the
required certification or whose certification the Attorney General determines is not in
compliance with § 16–503(c)(3) and (d) of this subtitle, unless the Attorney General has
determined that the violation has been cured to the satisfaction of the Attorney General.
(2) Neither a tobacco product manufacturer nor a brand family may be
included or retained in the directory if the Attorney General concludes, in the case of a
nonparticipating manufacturer, that:
(i) 1. any escrow payment required under [§ 16–403(a)(2)] §
16–403(A)(2)(I) of this title (the [Escrow] EQUITY Act) for any period for any brand
family, whether or not listed by such nonparticipating manufacturer, has not been fully
paid into a qualified escrow fund governed by a qualified escrow agreement that has been
approved by the Attorney General; or
2. ANY EQUITY FEE REQUIRED UNDER § 16–403(A)(2)(II)
OF THIS TITLE FOR ANY PERIOD FOR ANY BRAND FAMILY, WHETHER OR NOT LISTED
BY SUCH NONPARTICIPATING MANUFACTURER, HAS NOT BEEN FULLY PAID TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL; OR

HOUSE BILL 870 11
(ii) any outstanding final judgment, including interest on the
judgment, for a violation of the Escrow Act has not been fully satisfied for the brand family
or the manufacturer.
(3) The Attorney General shall update the directory as necessary in order
to correct mistakes and to add or remove a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family
to keep the directory in conformity with the requirements of this subtitle.
(4) Each licensed wholesaler shall provide and update as necessary an
electronic mail address to the Attorney General for the purpose of receiving any
notifications that may be required by this subtitle.
(c) A person may not:
(1) affix a stamp to a package or other container of cigarettes of a tobacco
product manufacturer or brand family not included in the directory; or
(2) sell, offer or possess for sale in this State, or import for personal
consumption in this State, cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family
not included in the directory.
16–506.
(e) (1) To promote compliance with this subtitle, the Attorney General may
adopt regulations requiring a tobacco product manufacturer subject to the requirements of
§ 16–503(a) of this subtitle to make the escrow deposits OR PAY THE EQUITY FEE required
in quarterly installments during the year in which the sales covered by the deposits OR
PAYMENTS are made.
(2) The Attorney General may require production of information sufficient
to enable the Attorney General to determine the adequacy of the amount of the installment
deposit OR PAYMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding the
provisions of § 1–210 of the General Provisions Article, the provisions of this Act are not
severable, and if any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction no other
provision or application of this Act may be given effect.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In this section, “Master Settlement Agreement” means the settlement
agreement and related documents entered into on November 23, 1998, by the State and
leading United States tobacco product manufacturers.

HOUSE BILL 870
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 1–210 of the General Provisions Article,
the provisions of this Act are not severable, and if all or any portion of the equity fee
established under § 16–403 of the Business Regulation Article, as enacted under Section 1
of this Act, results in a determination by the Firm, as that term is defined by the Master
Settlement Agreement, that Title 16, Subtitle 4 (the Equity Act) of the Business Regulation
Article no longer constitutes a qualifying statute, as that term is defined in § IX(d)(1)(C) of
the Master Settlement Agreement, no other provision or application of this Act may be
given effect.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.